Illinois, session 104th, HB852.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cigarette Fire Safety Standard Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (425 ILCS 8/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Cigarette Fire Safety Standard Act. 9(Source: P.A. 94-775, eff. 1-1-08.)